Illinois, session 104th, SB2280.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Reimagine Public Safety Act is amended by 5changing Sections 35-20 and 35-25 as follows: 6    (430 ILCS 69/35-20)7    Sec. 35-20. Office of Firearm Violence Prevention. 8    (a) On or before October 1, 2021, an Office of Firearm 9Violence Prevention is established within the Illinois 10Department of Human Services. The Assistant Secretary of 11Violence Prevention shall report his or her actions to the 12Secretary of Human Services and the Office of the Governor. 13The Office shall have the authority to coordinate and 14integrate all programs and services listed in this Act and 15other programs and services the Governor establishes by 16executive order to maximize an integrated approach to reducing 17Illinois' firearm violence epidemic and ultimately ending this 18public health crisis. 19    (b) The Department of Human Services and the Office of 20Firearm Violence Prevention shall have grant making, 21operational, and procurement authority to distribute funds to 22violence prevention organizations, youth development 23organizations, high-risk youth intervention organizations,   SB2280 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10719 BDA 20798 b1approved technical assistance and training providers, 2evaluation and assessment organizations, and other entities 3necessary to execute the functions established in this Act and 4other programs and services the Governor establishes by 5executive order for the Department and the Office. 6    (c) The Assistant Secretary of Firearm Violence Prevention 7shall be appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent 8of the Senate. The Assistant Secretary of Firearm Violence 9Prevention shall receive an annual salary of $170,000 or as 10set by the Governor, whichever is higher, and, beginning July 111, 2023, shall be compensated from appropriations provided to 12the Comptroller for this purpose. On July 1, 2023, and on each 13July 1 thereafter, the Assistant Secretary shall receive an 14increase in salary based on a cost of living adjustment as 15authorized by Senate Joint Resolution 192 of the 86th General 16Assembly. The Assistant Secretary of Firearm Violence 17Prevention shall report to the Secretary of Human Services and 18also report his or her actions to the Office of the Governor. 19    (d) For Illinois municipalities with a 1,000,000 or more 20population, the Office of Firearm Violence Prevention shall 21determine the 10 most violent neighborhoods. When possible, 22this shall be determined by measuring the number of per capita 23fatal and nonfatal firearm-shot victims, excluding 24self-inflicted incidents, from January 1, 2016 through 25December 31, 2020. These 10 communities shall qualify for 26grants under this Act and coordination of other State services   SB2280 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 10719 BDA 20798 b1from the Office of Firearm Violence Prevention. The Office 2shall, after identifying the top 10 neighborhoods, identify an 3additional 7 eligible neighborhoods by considering the number 4of victims in rank order in addition to the per capita rate. If 5appropriate, and subject to appropriation, the Office shall 6have the authority to consider adding up to 5 additional 7eligible neighborhoods or clusters of contiguous neighborhoods 8utilizing the same data sets so as to maximize the potential 9impact for firearm violence reduction. For Illinois 10municipalities with less than 1,000,000 residents and more 11than 35,000 residents, the Office of Firearm Violence 12Prevention shall identify the 10 municipalities or contiguous 13geographic areas that have the greatest concentrated firearm 14violence victims. When possible, this shall be determined by 15measuring the number of fatal and nonfatal firearm-shot 16victims, excluding self-inflicted incidents, from January 1, 172016 through December 31, 2020 divided by the number of 18residents for each municipality or area. These 10 19municipalities or contiguous geographic areas and up to 5 20additional municipalities or contiguous geographic areas 21identified by the Office of Firearm Violence Prevention shall 22qualify for grants under this Act and coordination of other 23State services from the Office of Firearm Violence Prevention. 24The Office of Firearm Violence Prevention shall consider 25factors listed in subsection (a) of Section 35-40 to determine 26up to 5 additional municipalities or contiguous geographic   SB2280 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 10719 BDA 20798 b1areas that qualify for grants under this Act. The Office of 2Firearm Violence Prevention may, subject to appropriation, 3identify up to 5 additional neighborhoods, municipalities, 4contiguous geographic areas, or other local 5government-identified boundary areas to receive funding under 6this Act after considering additional risk factors that 7contribute to community firearm violence. The data analysis to 8identify new eligible neighborhoods and municipalities shall 9be updated to reflect eligibility based on the most recently 10available 5 full years of data no more frequently than once 11every 3 years. 12    (e) The Office of Firearm Violence Prevention shall issue 13a report to the General Assembly annually no later than 14January 1 of each year that identifies communities within 15Illinois municipalities of 1,000,000 or more residents and 16municipalities with less than 1,000,000 residents and more 17than 35,000 residents that are experiencing concentrated 18firearm violence, explaining the investments that are being 19made to reduce concentrated firearm violence, and making 20further recommendations on how to end Illinois' firearm 21violence epidemic.22(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-679, eff. 12-10-21; 23102-1115, eff. 1-9-23.) 24    (430 ILCS 69/35-25)25    Sec. 35-25. Integrated violence prevention and other   SB2280 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 10719 BDA 20798 b1services. 2    (a) Subject to appropriation, for municipalities with 31,000,000 or more residents, the Office of Firearm Violence 4Prevention shall make grants to violence prevention 5organizations for evidence-based violence prevention services. 6Approved technical assistance and training providers shall 7create learning communities for the exchange of information 8between community-based organizations in the same or similar 9fields. Firearm violence prevention organizations shall 10prioritize individuals at the highest risk of firearm violence 11victimization and provide these individuals with 12evidence-based comprehensive services that reduce their 13exposure to chronic firearm violence.14    (a-5) Grants may be awarded under this Act to Reimagine 15Public Safety grantees or their subgrantees to provide any one 16or more of the following services to Reimagine Public Safety 17program participants or credible messengers: 18        (1) Behavioral health services, including clinical 19    interventions, crisis interventions, and group counseling 20    supports, such as peer support groups, social-emotional 21    learning supports, including skill building for anger 22    management, de-escalation, sensory stabilization, coping 23    strategies, and thoughtful decision-making, short-term 24    clinical individual sessions, psycho-social assessments, 25    and motivational interviewing. 26            (A) Funds awarded under this paragraph may be used   SB2280 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 10719 BDA 20798 b1        for behavioral health services until July 1, 2026 2        2025. 3            (B) Any community violence prevention service 4        provider being reimbursed from funds awarded under 5        this paragraph for behavioral health services must 6        also file a plan to become Medicaid certified for 7        violence prevention-community support team services 8        under the Illinois Medicaid program on or before July 9        1, 2026 2025. 10        (2) Capacity-building services, including 11    administrative and programmatic support, services, and 12    resources, such as subcontract development, budget 13    development, grant monitoring and reporting, and fiscal 14    sponsorship. Capacity-building services financed with 15    grants awarded under this Act may also include intensive 16    training and technical assistance focused on Community 17    Violence Intervention (CVI) not-for-profit business 18    operations, best practice delivery of firearm violence 19    prevention services, and assistance with administering and 20    meeting fiscal reporting or auditing requirements. 21    Capacity-building services financed with grants awarded 22    under this Act must be directed to a current or potential 23    Reimagine Public Safety firearm violence prevention 24    provider and cannot exceed 20% of potential funds awarded 25    to the relevant provider or future provider. 26        (3) Legal aid services, including funding for staff   SB2280 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 10719 BDA 20798 b1    attorneys and paralegals to provide education, training, 2    legal services, and advocacy for program recipients. Legal 3    aid services that may be provided with grant funds awarded 4    under this Act include "Know Your Rights" clinics, 5    trainings targeting returning citizens and families 6    impacted by incarceration, and long-term legal efforts 7    addressing expungement, civil rights, family law, housing, 8    employment, and victim rights. Legal aid services provided 9    with grant funds awarded under this Act shall not be 10    directed toward criminal justice issues. 11        (4) Housing services, including grants for emergency 12    and temporary housing for individuals at immediate risk of 13    firearm violence, except that grant funding provided under 14    this paragraph must be directed only toward Reimagine 15    Public Safety program participants. 16        (5) Workforce development services, including grants 17    for job coaching, intensive case management, employment 18    training and placement, and retention services, including 19    the provision of transitional job placements and access to 20    basic certificate training for industry-specific jobs. 21    Training also includes the provision of education-related 22    content, such as financial literacy training, GED 23    preparation, and academic coaching. 24        (6) Re-entry services for individuals exiting the 25    State or county criminal justice systems, if those 26    individuals are either eligible for services under this   SB2280 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 10719 BDA 20798 b1    Act as participants or are individuals who can make an 2    immediate contribution to mediate neighborhood conflicts 3    if they receive stabilizing services. Re-entry services 4    financed with grants awarded under this Act include all 5    services authorized under this Act, including services 6    listed in this subsection. 7        (7) Victim services, including assessments and 8    screening of victim needs, planning sessions related to 9    assessments, service planning and goal setting, assessing 10    intervention needs, notifying and navigating participants 11    through public agency processes for victim compensation, 12    crisis intervention, emergency financial assistance, 13    transportation, medical care, stable housing, and shelter, 14    assessment and linkage to public benefits, and relocation 15    services. 16    (b) In the geographic areas they serve, violence 17prevention organizations shall develop expertise in:18        (1) Analyzing and leveraging data to identify the 19    individuals who will most benefit from evidence-based 20    violence prevention services in their geographic areas.21        (2) Identifying the conflicts that are responsible for 22    recurring violence.23        (3) Having relationships with individuals who are most 24    able to reduce conflicts.25        (4) Addressing the stabilization and trauma recovery 26    needs of individuals impacted by violence by providing   SB2280 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 10719 BDA 20798 b1    direct services for their unmet needs or referring them to 2    other qualified service providers. 3        (5) Having and building relationships with community 4    members and community organizations that provide 5    evidence-based violence prevention services and get 6    referrals of people who will most benefit from 7    evidence-based violence prevention services in their 8    geographic areas. 9        (6) Providing training and technical assistance to 10    local law enforcement agencies to improve their 11    effectiveness without having any role, requirement, or 12    mandate to participate in the policing, enforcement, or 13    prosecution of any crime. 14    (c) Violence prevention organizations receiving grants 15under this Act shall coordinate services with other violence 16prevention organizations in their area.17    (d) The Office of Firearm Violence Prevention shall 18identify, for each separate eligible service area under this 19Act, an experienced violence prevention organization to serve 20as the Lead Violence Prevention Convener for that area and 21provide each Lead Violence Prevention Convener with a grant to 22coordinate monthly meetings between violence prevention 23organizations and youth development organizations under this 24Act. The Lead Violence Prevention Convener may also receive, 25from the Office of Firearm Violence Prevention, technical 26assistance or training through approved providers when needs   SB2280 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 10719 BDA 20798 b1are jointly identified. The Lead Violence Prevention Convener 2shall:3        (1) provide the convened organizations with summary 4    notes recommendations made at the monthly meetings to 5    improve the effectiveness of evidence-based violence 6    prevention services based on review of timely data on 7    shootings and homicides in his or her relevant 8    neighborhood;9        (2) attend monthly meetings where the cause of 10    violence and other neighborhood disputes is discussed and 11    strategize on how to resolve ongoing conflicts and execute 12    on agreed plans;13        (3) (blank);14        (4) on behalf of the convened organizations, make 15    consensus recommendations to the Office of Firearm 16    Violence Prevention and local law enforcement on how to 17    reduce violent conflict in his or her neighborhood;18        (5) meet on an emergency basis when conflicts that 19    need immediate attention and resolution arise;20        (6) share knowledge and strategies of the community 21    violence dynamic in monthly meetings with local youth 22    development specialists receiving grants under this Act; 23        (7) select when and where needed an approved Office of 24    Violence Prevention-funded technical assistance and 25    training service provider to receive agreed upon services; 26    and   SB2280 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 10719 BDA 20798 b1        (8) after meeting with community residents and other 2    community organizations that have expertise in housing, 3    mental health, economic development, education, and social 4    services, make recommendations to the Office of Firearm 5    Violence Prevention on how to target community 6    revitalization resources available from federal and State 7    funding sources.8    The Office of Firearm Violence Prevention shall compile 9recommendations from all Lead Violence Prevention Conveners 10and report to the General Assembly annually bi-annually on 11these funding recommendations. The Lead Violence Prevention 12Convener may also serve as a violence prevention or youth 13development provider.14    (e) The Illinois Office of Firearm Violence Prevention 15shall select, when possible and appropriate, no fewer than 2 16and no more than 3 approved technical assistance and training 17providers to deliver technical assistance and training to the 18violence prevention organizations that request to receive 19approved technical assistance and training. Violence 20prevention organizations shall have the opportunity to select 21among the approved technical assistance services providers 22funded by the Office of Firearm Violence Prevention, as long 23as the technical assistance provider has the capacity to 24effectively serve the grantees that have selected them. The 25Department shall make best efforts to accommodate second 26choices of violence prevention organizations when the violence   SB2280 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 10719 BDA 20798 b1prevention organizations' first choice does not have capacity 2to provide technical assistance. 3    (f) Approved technical assistance and training providers 4may:5        (1) provide training and certification to violence 6    prevention professionals on how to perform violence 7    prevention services and other professional development to 8    violence prevention professionals.9        (2) provide management training on how to manage 10    violence prevention professionals; 11        (3) provide training and assistance on how to develop 12    memorandum of understanding for referral services or 13    create approved provider lists for these referral 14    services, or both;15        (4) share lessons learned among violence prevention 16    professionals and service providers in their network; and17        (5) provide technical assistance and training on human 18    resources, grants management, capacity building, and 19    fiscal management strategies. 20    (g) Approved technical assistance and training providers 21shall:22        (1) provide additional services identified as 23    necessary by the Office of Firearm Violence Prevention and 24    service providers in their network; and 25        (2) receive a base grant of up to $250,000 plus 26    negotiated service rates to provide group and   SB2280 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 10719 BDA 20798 b1    individualized services to participating violence 2    prevention organizations.3    (h) (Blank). 4    (i) The Office of Firearm Violence Prevention shall issue 5grants, when possible and appropriate, to no fewer than 2 6violence prevention organizations in each of the eligible 7service areas and no more than 6 organizations. When possible, 8the Office of Firearm Violence Prevention shall work, subject 9to eligible applications received, to ensure that grant 10resources are equitably distributed across eligible service 11areas. The Office of Firearm Violence Prevention may establish 12grant award ranges to ensure grants will have the potential to 13reduce violence in each neighborhood. 14    (j) No violence prevention organization can serve more 15than 3 eligible service areas unless the Office of Firearm 16Violence Prevention is unable to identify violence prevention 17organizations to provide adequate coverage.18    (k) No approved technical assistance and training provider 19shall provide evidence-based violence prevention services in 20an eligible service area under this Act unless the Office of 21Firearm Violence Prevention is unable to identify qualified 22violence prevention organizations to provide adequate 23coverage.24(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-679, eff. 12-10-21; 25103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-1059, eff. 12-20-24.)